District of Columbia statutes.
7-2901

Establishment; purpose.

There is established a Health Care System Development Commission (“Commission”) to develop recommendations and an implementation plan for developing the health care system.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1302, 46 DCR 6373
Section 1301 of D.C. Law 13-38 provided: “This title may be cited as the ‘Health Care System Development Commission Establishment Act of 1999’.”
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 7-2901 to 7-2906, see §§ 1302 to 1307 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).